Arkansas, session 2025, HB1370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-10-127 is amended to read as follows:
6-10-127. Making up missed school days.
(a) If a superintendent closes school for a regularly scheduled school
day due to an exceptional or emergency circumstances such as a contagious
disease outbreak, inclement weather, or other acts of God circumstance, then
the superintendent may make up missed school days by adding time to the
beginning or ending end of a regular school day for a minimum of sixty (60)
minutes.
(b)(1) Each public school district shall include an additional seven
(7) days or the hourly equivalent of seven (7) days, as applicable, in the
public school district's annual school calendar.
*TNL166*
03-03-2025 10:21:57 TNL166

As Engrossed: H3/3/25 HB1370
(2) The additional seven (7) days or the hourly equivalent of
seven (7) days, as applicable, included in an annual school calendar under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section:
(A) Shall be used before an additional student attendance
day or its hourly equivalent under subsection (c) is granted by the
Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education; and
(B) May be used for:
(i) A day off school during a school week; or
(ii) A day unavoidably lost due to an exceptional or
emergency circumstance.
(b)(1) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education (c)(1)
Upon using all seven (7) school days or the hourly equivalent of seven (7)
school days, as applicable, under subsection (b) of this section, the
commissioner may grant up to the equivalent of ten (10) three (3) student
attendance days or the hourly equivalent of three (3) student attendance
days, as applicable, for public school districts that have an alternative
instruction plan approved by the commissioner for the use of alternative
methods of instruction, including without limitation virtual learning, on
days when the a public school district is closed due to an exceptional or
emergency circumstances such as: circumstance
(A) A contagious disease outbreak, inclement weather, or
other acts of God; or
(B) A utility outage.
(2) The public school district's alternative instruction plan
shall demonstrate how teaching and learning in the public school district
will not be negatively impacted by the use of alternative methods of
instruction under subdivision (b)(1) (c)(1) of this section.
(d) If a public school district is closed due to an exceptional or
emergency circumstance for more than ten (10) student attendance days or the
hourly equivalent of ten (10) student attendance days, as applicable, in a
school year, then the public school district shall:
(1) Make up each student attendance day missed because of the
exceptional or emergency circumstance; or
(2) Submit a written application to the State Board of Education
requesting additional student attendance days or the hourly equivalent of the
requested additional student attendance days, as applicable, under
03-03-2025 10:21:57 TNL166

As Engrossed: H3/3/25 HB1370
subdivision (c)(1) of this section if the public school district has an
alternative instruction plan approved by the commissioner for the use of
alternative methods of instruction, including without limitation virtual
learning.
(e) As used in this section, "exceptional or emergency circumstance"
means:
(1) A contagious disease outbreak;
(2) Inclement weather;
(3) Other acts of God;
(4) A utility outage; or
(5) Any other unforeseen circumstance caused or created by
humans, including without limitation an active shooter event or a threat of
an active shooter event, that acts as a principal cause of a public school
district's inability to conduct a portion of the minimum number of hours
required for a school day under § 6-16-102.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2403(c), concerning requirements to be
eligible to receive state funds to implement classroom teacher salary raises,
is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) To Except as provided under subdivision (c)(2) of this section,
to be eligible for funds to implement the salary increases under subsections
(a) and (b) of this section, each public school district and open-enrollment
public charter school shall be open for on-site, in-person instruction for at
least:
(1)(A) One hundred seventy-eight (178) days; or
(2)(B) One thousand sixty-eight (1,068) hours.
(2) However, a student attendance day or its hourly equivalent,
as applicable, authorized under § 6-10-127 for the use of alternative methods
of instruction when a public school district is closed due to an exceptional
or emergency circumstance shall count towards the required number of days or
hours, whichever the public school district uses, as required under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

/s/J. Mayberry


03-03-2025 10:21:57 TNL166